Florida, session 2026, HB843.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
35
36 Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Florida Age Gate
37 Act."
38 Section 2. Section 569.33, Florida Statutes, is amended to
39 read:
40 569.33 Consent to inspection and search without warrant.—
41 (1)(a) An applicant for a retail nicotine products dealer
42 permit, by accepting the permit when issued, agrees that the
43 place or premises covered by the permit is subject to inspection
44 and search without a search warrant by the division or its
45 authorized assistants, and by sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, or
46 police officers, to determine compliance with this part.
47 (b) The division or its authorized assistants shall
48 inspect on a regular basis the place or premises of a retail
49 nicotine products dealer who advertises, promotes, or displays
50 for sale a nicotine dispensing device that has not received a
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb843-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 843 2026
51 marketing granted order under 21 U.S.C. s. 387j in order to
52 determine compliance with this part.
53 (2) An applicant for a retail nicotine products dealer
54 permit, by accepting the permit when issued, agrees that the
55 place or premises covered by the permit is subject to inspection
56 and search without a search warrant by the Department of Law
57 Enforcement for any violation involving the advertisement,
58 promotion, or display for sale of a nicotine dispensing device
59 that has not received a marketing granted order under 21 U.S.C.
60 s. 387j.
61 Section 3. Section 569.35, Florida Statutes, is amended to
62 read:
63 569.35 Retail nicotine product dealers; administrative
64 penalties.—
65 (1) The division may suspend or revoke the permit of a
66 retail nicotine products dealer, including the retail tobacco
67 products dealer permit of a retail tobacco products dealer as
68 defined in s. 569.002(4), upon sufficient cause appearing of the
69 violation of any of the provisions of this part, by a dealer, or
70 by a dealer's agent or employee.
71 (2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), the division
72 may also assess and accept an administrative fine of up to
73 $1,000 against a dealer for each violation. The division shall
74 deposit all fines collected into the General Revenue Fund as
75 collected.
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb843-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 843 2026
76 (b) For each violation involving the sale of a nicotine
77 dispensing device that has not received a marketing granted
78 order under 21 U.S.C. s. 387j, or the advertising, promoting, or
79 displaying for sale such a device, the division may:
80 1. For a first violation, assess and accept an
81 administrative fine in an amount not less than $500, but no more
82 than $1,000, and shall order a dealer to take corrective action
83 within 15 days after notice of the violation.
84 2. For a second violation, assess and accept an
85 administrative fine in an amount not less than $1,000, but no
86 more than $2,500, and shall suspend the dealer's permit for not
87 more than 3 days.
88 3. For a third violation, assess and accept an
89 administrative fine in an amount not less than $2,500, but no
90 more than $5,000, and shall suspend the dealer's permit for not
91 more than 30 days.
92 4. For a fourth violation, assess and accept an
93 administrative fine in an amount not less than $5,000, and shall
94 suspend the dealer's permit for not more than 90 days.
95 5. For a fifth or subsequent violation, revoke the
96 dealer's permit.
97
98 One-half of the fines collected under this paragraph shall be
99 deposited in the Professional Regulation Trust Fund, and the
100 other half to the Department of Law Enforcement Operating Trust
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb843-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 843 2026
101 Fund.
102 (3) An order imposing an administrative fine becomes
103 effective 15 days after the date of the order. The division may
104 suspend the imposition of a penalty against a dealer,
105 conditioned upon the dealer's compliance with terms the division
106 considers appropriate.
107 Section 4. Section 569.37, Florida Statutes, is amended to
108 read:
109 569.37 Sale or delivery of nicotine products;
110 restrictions.—
111 (1) In order to prevent persons under 21 years of age from
112 purchasing or receiving nicotine products, the sale or delivery
113 of nicotine products is prohibited, except:
114 (a) When under the direct control or line of sight of the
115 dealer or the dealer's agent or employee; or
116 (b) Sales from a vending machine are prohibited under
117 paragraph (a) and are only permissible from a machine that is
118 equipped with an operational lockout device that is under the
119 control of the dealer or the dealer's agent or employee who
120 directly regulates the sale of items through the machine by
121 triggering the lockout device to allow the dispensing of one
122 nicotine product. The lockout device must include a mechanism to
123 prevent the machine from functioning if the power source for the
124 lockout device fails or if the lockout device is disabled and a
125 mechanism to ensure that only one nicotine product is dispensed
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb843-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 843 2026
126 at a time.
127 (2)(a) A dealer that sells nicotine products may not sell,
128 permit to be sold, offer for sale, or display for sale such
129 products or devices by means of self-service merchandising.
130 (b) A dealer that sells nicotine products may not place
131 such products or devices in an open display unit unless the unit
132 is located in an area that is inaccessible to customers.
133 (3)(a)1. A dealer that sells a nicotine dispensing device
134 that has not received a marketing granted order under 21 U.S.C.
135 s. 387j, and that does not prohibit individuals under 21 years
136 of age on the licensed premises, may not:
137 a. Advertise, promote, or display for sale such device.
138 b. Advertise, promote, or display for sale such device in
139 an area visible to any person outside the licensed premises.
140 c. Advertise, promote, or display for sale such device
141 inside the licensed premises in a manner visible to persons
142 under 21 years of age, including, but not limited to, the
143 placement of such a device in an open display unit visible to
144 persons under 21 years of age.
145 2. Subparagraph 1. does not apply to a nicotine dispensing
146 device that has received a marketing granted order under 21
147 U.S.C. s. 387j, including:
148 a. Each stock keeping unit marketed by the manufacturer of
149 such a device under the same brand family; and
150 b. A closed-system, replacement cartridge device designed
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb843-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 843 2026
151 exclusively for use with a proprietary, reusable, and
152 rechargeable device that has received a marketing granted order
153 under 21 U.S.C. s. 387j, provided a dealer sells such device, or
154 advertises, promotes, or displays for sale such device, in
155 compliance with this section.
156 (b) A dealer that sells a nicotine dispensing device that
157 has received a marketing granted order under 21 U.S.C. s. 387j,
158 and that prohibits persons under 21 years of age on the licensed
159 premises, may advertise, promote, or display for sale such
160 device in areas visible to any person inside or outside the
161 licensed premises.
162 (4)(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1)–(3), this section
163 does The provisions of subsections (1) and (2) shall not apply
164 to an establishment that prohibits persons under 21 years of age
165 on the licensed premises.
166 (5)(4) A dealer or a dealer's agent or employee must
167 require proof of age of a purchaser of a nicotine product before
168 selling the product to that person, unless the purchaser appears
169 to be 30 years of age or older.
170 Section 5. Section 569.39, Florida Statutes, is amended to
171 read:
172 569.39 Rulemaking authority.—The division shall adopt
173 rules to administer and enforce this part. Such rules must
174 include guidelines for compliance audits and enforcement actions
175 relating to advertising, promoting, or displaying for sale
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb843-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 843 2026
176 nicotine dispensing devices that have not received a marketing
177 granted order under 21 U.S.C. s. 387j, and shall expressly
178 authorize establishments that prohibit persons under 21 years of
179 age on the licensed premises to sell single-use nicotine
180 dispensing devices that have not received a marketing granted
181 order under 21 U.S.C. s. 387j, consistent with s. 569.37.
182 Section 6. Subsections (3) and (4) of section 569.44,
183 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (4) and (5),
184 respectively, and a new subsection (3) is added to that section,
185 to read:
186 569.44 Annual report.—The division shall report annually
187 with written findings to the Legislature and the Governor by
188 December 31 on the progress of implementing the enforcement
189 provisions of this part. This must include, but is not limited
190 to:
191 (3) The number of violations of s. 569.37(3) for
192 advertising, promoting, or displaying for sale a nicotine
193 dispensing device that has not received a marketing granted
194 order under 21 U.S.C. s. 387j, and any penalties imposed
195 pursuant to s. 569.35(2).
196 Section 7. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb843-00